Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0758.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "kids code act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Actual knowledge" means all information and inferences known to the covered online service provider relating to the age of an individual, including, but not limited to, self-identified age and any age the covered online service provider has attributed or associated with the individual for any purpose, including, but not limited to, marketing, advertising, or product development. If a covered online service provider's classification of an individual for purposes of marketing or advertising is inconsistent with the individual's self-identified age, a covered online service provider shall disregard self-identified age for the purposes of having actual knowledge. (b) "Adult" means an individual who is 18 years of age or older. (c) "Biometric data" means, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), data that is generated from the technological processing of an individual's unique biological, physical, or physiological characteristics that is used to allow or confirm the unique identification of the consumer, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Iris or retina scans. (ii) Fingerprints. (iii) Facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates. (iv) Vein patterns. (v) Voice prints or vocal biomarkers. (vi) Gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns. (d) Biometric data does not include any of the following: (i) A digital or physical photograph. (ii) An audio or video recording. (iii) Any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or an audio or video recording, unless that data is generated to identify a specific individual. (e) "Collect" means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, or accessing any personal data pertaining to a consumer by any means. Collect includes, but is not limited to, receiving information from a consumer, either actively or passively, or by observing the consumer's behavior. (f) "Common branding" means a shared name, service mark, or trademark for which the average consumer would understand that 2 or more entities are commonly owned. (g) "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of this state. (h) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (i) "Covered child" means a consumer who a covered online service provider has actual knowledge is less than 13 years of age. (j) "Covered design feature" means a feature or component of an online service that is designed primarily to encourage or increase the frequency, time spent, or activity of a user on the online service. Covered design feature includes, but is not limited to, all of the following features: (i) Infinite scroll or a design feature where content automatically and continuously loads at the bottom of a screen, other than what the user explicitly prompted, requested, or searched for. (ii) Auto-playing video or audio, or a design feature in which a video or audio automatically begins playing when a user navigates to or scrolls through a set of videos without any explicit action on the part of a user indicating the user's desire to watch that specific video or listen to that audio. (iii) Quantification of engagement, including, but not limited to, providing a visible count of how many likes, comments, clicks, views, or reactions a user-generated item has received. (iv) Gamification, or a design feature that emulates gameplay, including, but not limited to, a streak, badge, or reward that motivates or causes more frequent or more extensive use of an online service through incentives or frequency of use. (v) The use of clustering, timing, or volume of notifications or push alerts, irrespective of content. (vi) A design feature in which virtual currencies are used or where digital items are purchased. (vii) Image-altering filters or a design feature that facilitates a false perception of an image. (viii) Requiring or repeatedly prompting for account creation in order to access publicly available user-generated content. (ix) Using ephemerality to prompt the urgent use of an online service. (x) Creating barriers to deleting an account or to removing connections to other users of the service. (xi) A feature that increases usage through the illusion of talking with a human being that seeks to elicit feelings of intimacy from the user. (k) "Covered minor" means a consumer who a covered online service provider has actual knowledge is a minor. Covered minor includes a covered child. (l) "Covered online service provider" means, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (m), either of the following: (i) A sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or other legal entity to which all of the following apply: (A) The entity owns, operates, controls, or provides an online service. (B) The entity conducts business in this state. (C) The entity generates a majority of its annual revenue from online services. (D) The entity alone, or jointly with the entity's affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent companies, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data of users. (E) The entity satisfies at least 1 of the following: (I) The entity has gross revenue in excess of $25,000,000.00. Beginning on January 1, 2029, and every 2 years thereafter, the department of treasury shall adjust the amount of annual gross revenue to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. (II) The entity annually processes the personal data of not less than 50,000 consumers or households. (ii) A person that controls or is controlled by a legal entity described in subparagraph (i) and that shares common branding with the legal entity. As used in this subparagraph, "controls" or "controlled" means any of the following: (A) Ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50% of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security of the legal entity. (B) Control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors of the legal entity, or of individuals exercising similar functions in the legal entity. (C) Power to exercise a controlling influence over the management of the legal entity. (m) Covered online service provider does not include a provider of an online service where the account owners of the online service who are known to be adults make up more than 98% of the online service's users. (n) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated with the effect of substantially impairing a covered minor's autonomy, decision making, or choice. (o) "Derived data" means data that is created by the derivation of information, data, assumptions, correlations, inferences, predictions, or conclusions from facts, evidence, or another source of information or data about a covered minor or a covered minor's device. (p) "Device" means any electronic equipment capable of collecting, processing, retaining, or transferring personal data. (q) "Knows to be an adult" means having actual knowledge that a user is an adult. (r) "Minor" means an individual who is less than 18 years of age. (s) "Online service" means a service, product, or feature that is accessible to the public via the internet. Online service includes a website or application. Online service does not include any of the following: (i) A telecommunications service as that term is defined in 47 USC 153. (ii) A broadband internet access service as that term is defined in 47 CFR 8.1. (iii) The sale, delivery, or use of a physical device. (t) "Parent" includes a legal guardian. (u) "Personal data" means information, including derived data and unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably linkable to 1 or more identified or identifiable individuals in a household. Personal data includes, but is not limited to, a user's history of interactions with the covered online service provider. Personal data does not include publicly available data. (v) "Precise geolocation information" means information that, by means of technology such as a global positioning system that provides latitude and longitude coordinates, identifies the specific location of an individual within a radius of 1,750 feet. Precise geolocation information does not include the content of communications or any data generated or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility. (w) "Process" means to perform an operation or set of operations by manual or automated means on personal data. Process includes using, storing, disclosing, sharing, analyzing, selling, or modifying personal data. (x) "Profile" means a form of automated processing of personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict certain aspects relating to a covered minor, including, but not limited to, a covered minor's economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements. (y) "Publicly available data" means, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (z), data that is any of the following: (i) That is lawfully made available from federal, state, or local government records. (ii) That a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public by the individual or from widely distributed media. (iii) That is made available by a person that the individual has disclosed that data to if the individual has not restricted the data to a specific audience. (z) Publicly available data does not include biometric data collected by a covered online service provider about a covered minor without the covered minor's knowledge. (aa) "Sensitive personal data" means personal data that includes any of the following: (i) An individual's Social Security, driver license, state identification card, or passport number. (ii) An individual's account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security of access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account. (iii) An individual's precise geolocation information. (iv) An individual's racial or ethnic origin, citizenship, immigration status, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership. (v) The contents of an individual's mail, email, text messages, prompts, or other form of communication that performs similar functions, including shared images and videos, unless the recipient is the intended recipient of the communication. (vi) An individual's genetic data. (vii) Biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual. (viii) Personal data that concerns an individual's health. (ix) Personal data that reveals information on an individual's sex, sex life, sexual orientation, gender, or gender identity. (bb) "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to an individual when the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from that individual's activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict the individual's preferences or interest. Targeted advertising does not include any of the following: (i) Advertisements based on activities within a covered online service provider's own online services. (ii) Advertisements based on the context of an individual's current search query, visit to an internet website, or use of an online application. (iii) Advertisements directed to an individual in response to the individual's request for information or feedback. (iv) Processing personal data solely to measure or report advertising frequency, performance, or reach. Sec. 5. This act does not apply to any of the following: (a) A federal, state, tribal, or local government entity in the ordinary course of operations. (b) Personal data that is subject to a statute or regulation identified under this subdivision that is controlled by a covered online service provider that is in compliance with the information security requirements and required to comply with 1 of the following: (i) Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley act, 15 USC 6801 to 6809. (ii) The health information technology for economic and clinical health act, Public Law 111-5. (iii) Regulations promulgated under section 264(c) of the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191. (c) Information, including, but not limited to, personal data, that is collected as part of a clinical trial that is subject to the federal policy for the protection of human subjects under 45 CFR Part 46. (d) Information that is collected in accordance with the "Good Clinical Practice Guidelines" issued by the International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use. (e) Information that is collected in accordance with the human subject protection requirements of the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 CFR part 50. Sec. 7. (1) This act does not limit or restrict in any way the application of other laws, statutes, rules, or regulations of this state. (2) In the event of a conflict between this act and 1 or more other laws of this state, the law that affords the greatest protection from harm to minors controls. Sec. 9. (1) A covered online service provider shall configure all default privacy settings provided for a covered minor to the highest level of privacy, including, but not limited to, all of the following default settings: (a) Not displaying the existence of the covered minor's account to any user the covered online service provider knows to be an adult unless 1 or more of the following applies: (i) The covered minor has expressly and unambiguously allowed the adult user to view the covered minor's account. (ii) The covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to make the covered minor's account's existence public. (b) Not displaying media created or posted by the covered minor to another user the covered online service provider knows to be an adult unless 1 or more of the following applies: (i) The covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to allow the adult user to view the covered minor's media. (ii) The covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to make the covered minor's media publicly available. (c) Not permitting a user the covered online service provider knows to be an adult to like, comment on, or otherwise provide feedback on the covered minor's media unless the covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to allow the adult user to do so. (d) Not permitting direct messaging between the covered minor and another user the covered online service provider knows to be an adult unless the covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to allow direct messaging with the adult user. (e) Not displaying the covered minor's location to other users unless the covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to share the covered minor's location with a specific user. (f) Not displaying the users connected to the covered minor on an online service unless the covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to share the information with a specific user. (g) Disabling search engine indexing of the covered minor's account profile, unless the covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to enable search engine indexing of the covered minor's account profile. (2) A covered online service provider shall not do either of the following: (a) Provide a covered minor with a single setting that makes all of the default privacy settings less protective at once. (b) Request or prompt a covered minor to make the covered minor's privacy settings less protective, unless the change is strictly necessary for the covered minor to access a service or feature they have expressly and unambiguously requested. (3) A covered online service provider shall do both of the following: (a) Provide a prominent, accessible, and responsive tool to allow a covered minor to request that the covered minor's account be unpublished or deleted. (b) Honor a request under subdivision (a) not later than 15 days after a covered online service provider receives the request. Sec. 11. (1) A covered online service provider shall only process or retain the minimum amount of a covered minor's personal data that is necessary to provide the specific elements of an online service with which the covered minor has knowingly engaged. A covered online service provider shall not use personal data under this subsection for any reason other than the reason for which the personal data was collected. (2) A covered online service provider is not required to collect the personal data of a user to comply with this act. A covered online service provider that collects personal data of a user for age verification shall not use the user's personal data for any other purpose and shall delete the user's personal data immediately after using the personal data for age verification. (3) A covered online service provider shall provide an obvious sign to a covered minor when precise geolocation information is being collected or used. (4) A covered online service provider shall not do any of the following: (a) Facilitate targeted advertising to a covered minor. (b) Send a notification to a covered minor between 10 p.m. and 6 a.m. and, on a weekday from September 1 to May 31, between 8 a.m. and 4 p.m. (c) Profile a covered minor unless profiling is necessary to provide an online service requested by the covered minor, and only with respect to the aspects of the online service with which the covered minor is actively and knowingly engaged. (d) Facilitate advertisements for prohibited products to covered minors, including, but not limited to, advertisements for narcotic drugs, tobacco products, gambling, and alcohol. (e) Use dark patterns. (f) Use the personal data of a covered minor to select, recommend, or prioritize media for the covered minor unless the recommendation, prioritization, or selection of media is based on any of the following: (i) The covered minor's express and unambiguous request to receive any of the following types of media: (A) Media from a specific account, feed, or user, or to receive more or less media from that account, feed, or user. (B) A specific category of media, such as videos depicting specific types of content, or to see more or less of that category of media. (C) More or less media with similar characteristics as the media the covered minor is currently viewing. (ii) User-selected privacy or accessibility settings. (iii) A search query by the covered minor if the search query is used only to select and prioritize media in response to the search. Sec. 13. (1) A covered online service provider shall provide a parent the ability to do all of the following for a covered child or a covered minor, as applicable: (a) Manage the covered child's privacy and account settings in a manner that allows the parent to view the covered child's account settings and change and control privacy and account settings of the covered child. (b) Restrict purchases and financial transactions of the covered minor. (c) Enable the parent to view the total time the covered child has spent on an online service and place reasonable limits on the covered child's use of the online service. (2) A covered online service provider shall offer a parent the ability to restrict a covered child's use of the online service during times of day specified by the parent, including during school hours and at night. (3) A covered online service provider shall notify a covered minor when any of the tools described in this section are in effect and describe what settings have been applied. Sec. 15. A covered online service provider shall establish mechanisms to enable a covered minor or a parent to report any harms experienced by a covered minor on the online service. Sec. 17. (1) By January 1 of each year, a covered online service provider that processes the personal data of covered minors as part of the covered online service provider's business shall issue a public report, prominently posted to the covered online service provider's website, that is prepared by an independent third-party auditor. A report under this subsection must contain all of the following information: (a) A detailed description of the covered online service provider as pertaining to minors, including the online service's covered design features, the use of personal data, and business practices. (b) Subject to subsection (2), all of the following information: (i) The purpose of the online service. (ii) The extent to which the online service is likely to be accessed by minors. (iii) An accounting of the total number and types of reports received under section 15 and an assessment of how those reports were addressed. (iv) Whether, how, and for what purpose the covered online service provider processes minors' personal data and sensitive personal data. (v) The design safety features for minors, the privacy protections for minors, and the tools for parents that the covered online service provider has adopted. (vi) Whether and how the online service uses covered design features. (vii) The covered online service provider's process for handling data access, deletion, and correction requests for minors' data. (viii) Age assurance, age verification, or age estimation methods used. (ix) Whether and how the covered online service provider utilized algorithms. (x) If the covered online service provider uses a covered design feature, the average daily time spent on the online service by covered minors for the 90th, 95th, 99th, and 99.9th percentile of covered minors. (2) The information required under subsection (1) must include a comparison of each category of information for different age groups, including all of the following age groups: (a) Individuals who are 10 to 12 years of age. (b) Individuals who are 13 to 15 years of age. (c) Individuals who are 16 to 17 years of age. (d) Individuals who are 18 years of age or older. (3) An independent auditor that prepares a report under subsection (1) shall follow inspection and consultation practices designed to ensure that the report is comprehensive and accurate and shall consult with experts on the use of online services by minors in relation to the preparation of the report. (4) A covered online service provider shall provide an independent auditor that prepares a report under subsection (1) full and complete cooperation and access to information and operations required to ensure that the report is comprehensive and accurate. (5) All personal data contained in the report required under subsection (1) must be deidentified and aggregated. Sec. 18. (1) The attorney general shall promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, including rules that prohibit or limit data processing practices or covered design features that facilitate compulsive use by covered minors or impair autonomy, decision making, or choice of covered minors. (2) The attorney general shall review and update rules promulgated under subsection (1) not less than once every 2 years to keep pace with emerging technology. Sec. 19. (1) A covered online service provider shall designate 1 or more of the covered online service provider's officers to be responsible for the covered online service provider's compliance with this act. (2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a covered online service provider that violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $50,000.00 for each violation. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 759 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.